Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1082
Nursery, defined.

Nursery shall mean any property where nursery stock is grown, propagated, collected, or distributed and shall include, but not be limited to, private property or any property owned, leased, or managed by any agency of the United States, the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions, or any other state or its political subdivisions where nursery stock is fumigated, treated, packed, or stored by any person.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 11.